Utah statutes.
58-60-108.   Grounds for action regarding license -- Disciplinary proceedings.

The division's grounds for refusing to issue a license to an applicant, for refusing to renew the license of a licensee, for revoking, suspending, restricting, or placing on probation the license of a licensee, for issuing a public or private reprimand to a licensee, and for issuing a cease and desist order are under Section 58-1-401.



Enacted by Chapter 32, 1994 General Session

